District of Columbia statutes.
2-133

Assistant Electrical Engineer.

The Assistant Electrical Engineer shall perform the duties of the Electrical Engineer in the absence or disability of the latter and shall have the same qualifications as to ability and technical knowledge as is required by law of the head of the Department.

History

Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 981, ch. 192

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1021.
1973 Ed., § 1-722.